Washington statutes.
RCW 18.100.133

Business corporations, election of this chapter.

A business corporation formed under the provisions of Title 23B RCW may amend its articles of incorporation to change its stated purpose to the rendering of professional services and to conform to the requirements of this chapter. Upon the effective date of such amendment, the corporation shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter and shall continue in existence as a professional corporation under this chapter.

[ 1991 c 72 s 6; 1986 c 261 s 5.]